Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.110

Legal holiday—Sitting deemed adjourned.

If any legal holiday happens to be a day appointed for the sitting of a court or to which it is adjourned, such sitting shall be deemed appointed for or adjourned to the next day which is not a legal holiday.

[ 1927 c 51 s 3; RRS s 65. Prior: 1891 c 41 s 3.]